Wisconsin, session 2025, SB97.
do enact as follows:SB97,11Section 1. 118.07 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB97,2,152118.07 (6) (a) Each school board, governing body of a private school, and 3operator of a charter school shall, by no later than the end of the day on which a 4credible report alleging sexual misconduct, as defined in s. 948.098 (1) (d), by a 5school staff member, as defined in s. 948.098 (1) (c), is received, shall notify the 6parents or guardians of each pupil alleged to be a victim, target, or recipient of the 7alleged sexual misconduct by the school staff member. For purposes of this 8paragraph, a report is considered to be received by a school board or the operator of 9a charter school when it is received by an individual employed by the school district 10or operator of the charter school and for purposes of that employment the individual 11is required to hold a license issued by the department under s. PI 34.066 or 34.067, 12Wis. Adm. Code. For purposes of this paragraph, a report is considered to be 13received by the governing body of a private school when it is received by an 14individual employed by the governing body of the private school as an assistant 15principal, a principal, or an administrator, as defined in s. 118.60 (1) (ad).SB97,3,216(b) Each school board shall annually provide parents and guardians with 1information regarding their rights to access records regarding school employee 2discipline under subch. II of ch. 19.SB97,23Section 2. Initial applicability.SB97,3,54(1) This act first applies to a credible report alleging sexual misconduct by a 5school staff member that is received on the effective date of this subsection.SB97,3,66